Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Chapter 16. Regulation of Sales and Distribution.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning restriction of location near churches and schools, see
AS

04.11.410

; for provisions concerning accessibility of premises to inspection, see
AS

04.11.630

; for provisions concerning municipal regulation, see
AS

04.21.010

; for provisions concerning proof of age, see
AS

04.21.050

; for provisions concerning refusal of service, see
AS

04.21.055

; for provisions concerning warehousing of alcoholic beverages, see
AS

04.21.060

.

Collateral references. —

What constitutes “sale” of liquor in violation of statute or ordinance. 89 ALR3d 551.

Validity of state statute or regulation fixing minimum prices at which alcoholic beverages may be sold at retail. 96 ALR3d 639.